Mississippi, session 2026, HB1200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The title of this chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Safe Dorms Act." SECTION 2. For purposes of this act, these following terms  shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless context of use clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Student" means any person enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis in a state institution of higher learning. (b)  "State institution of higher learning" means any public technical institute, public junior college, public senior college or university, law school, medical or dental school, public state college, or other agency of higher education. (c)  "Living facility" means a structure or part of a structure owned, managed by, or under the authority of a state institution of higher learning that is used as a residence or sleeping place by one or more students. (d)  "Guest" is a person or student not assigned to reside in the living facility owned, managed by, or under the authority of the state institution of higher learning. SECTION 3.  A student subject to the registration requirements under Section 45-33-21 through 45-33-63 may not reside in a living facility owned, managed by or under the authority of a state institution of higher learning. SECTION 4.  No employee of a state institution of higher learning shall enter into a consensual sexual, romantic or intimate social or personal relationship with a student over whom he or she exercises, has exercised or may exercise in the future, direct or otherwise significant academic, administrative, supervisory, evaluative, counseling or extracurricular authority or influence. SECTION 5. (1)  State institutions of higher learning shall: (a)  Provide every student the choice of residing in a single-sex living facility in which members of the opposite biological sex are not allowed as guests or visitors and are not allowed entry at any time, except in a designated public visiting room in the living facility; and (b)  Require all first-year students, who are not married and under the age of twenty-one (21), to reside in a single-sex living facility in which members of the opposite biological sex are not allowed as guests or visitors and are not allowed entry at any time, except in a designated public visiting room in the living facility. (2)  This chapter shall not apply to: (a)  State institutions of higher learning employees, including members of campus security, engaged in the exercise of their normal duties; (b)  A firefighter, law enforcement officer, or any emergency medical personnel acting within the scope and duty of their office; or (c)  The direct family members or grandparents of students during select hours or events and activities, such as moving in or out of the residence, subject to the policies determined by each state institution of higher learning. SECTION 6. State institutions of higher learning shall develop materials, programs and procedures to ensure that students, administrators, campus police officers, residence life officials, and professors, understand the policies, regulations and duties of state institutions of higher learning regarding the policies set forth herein, including any data that demonstrates a reduced incidence of sexual assault in single-sex living facilities that do not allow guests of the opposite biological sex. SECTION 7. (1)  Any student aggrieved by a violation of this act may bring a civil action against the state institution of higher learning and its employees acting in their official capacities, responsible for violation of this chapter, as determined by a preponderance of the evidence, and seek appropriate relief, including, but not limited to, injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs.  If a court should find a violation of this act, it shall issue an award of at least Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per violation. (2)  Any student aggrieved by a violation of this act may assert such violation as a defense or counter claim in any disciplinary action or in any civil or administrative proceedings brought against such student.  Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit any other remedies available to any student. SECTION 8.  A student shall be required to bring suit for violation of this section not later than one (1) year after the day the cause of action accrues.  For purposes of calculating the one-year limitation period, each day that the violation persists, and each day that a policy in violation of this section remains in effect, shall constitute a new day that the cause of action has accrued. SECTION 9.  A state institution of higher learning that violates this act is not immune from suit or liability for the violation. SECTION 10. Any provision of this act held to be invalid or unenforceable by its terms, or as applied to any person or circumstance, shall be construed so as to give it the maximum effect permitted by law, unless such holding shall be one of utter invalidity or unenforceability, in which event such provision shall be deemed severable and shall not affect the remainder hereof or the application of such provision to other persons not similarly situated or to other, dissimilar circumstances. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.